California statutes. Education Code
(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 15, Sec. 64.   (AB 99)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Duties of Publishers and Manufacturers [60220. - 60227.]

60220.

All publishers and manufacturers submitting instructional materials for adoption by the state board shall comply with the provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 60000) to Article 7 (commencing with Section 60100), inclusive, of this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

60221.

Publishers and manufacturers submitting instructional materials for adoption shall provide sample copies of such materials in quantities to be determined by the state board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

60222.

Publishers and manufacturers, at a time designated by the state board, shall submit detailed specifications of the physical characteristics of that material. The publisher or manufacturer shall comply with those specifications if the material is adopted and purchased in completed form by the state board or any district board. Changes in specifications may be made when approved by the state board and the publisher or manufacturer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 413, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

60223.

Publishers and manufacturers may biennially submit revisions to price schedules submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 60201.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 413, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

60225.

As agreed upon by publishers and school districts, publishers may provide in-service training or professional development in the use of the instructional materials provided by them.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 413, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

60226.

Publishers and manufacturers shall, in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the state board, develop plans to improve the quality and reliability of instructional materials through learner verification. District boards shall be encouraged to permit publishers and manufacturers to have limited access to classrooms for necessary testing and observation. Publishers and manufacturers shall provide copies of test results and evaluations made as part of learner verification at the request of any governing board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 211, Sec. 5.   Effective June 27, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

60227.

(a) For purposes of this section, a followup adoption is any adoption other than the primary adoption that occurs pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 60200.

(b) Before conducting a followup adoption in the subject areas of language arts and mathematics, the department shall post an appropriate notice on the its internet website pursuant to subdivision (c) and notify all publishers or manufacturers known to produce basic instructional materials in that subject area.

(c) The notice shall specify that each publisher or manufacturer choosing to participate in the followup adoption shall be assessed a fee based on the number of programs the publisher or manufacturer indicates will be
 submitted for review and the number of grade levels proposed to be covered by each program.

(d) The amount of the fee shall not exceed the reasonable costs to the department to conduct the followup adoption process pursuant to this section. The department shall take reasonable steps to limit costs of the followup adoption and to keep the fee modest, recognizing that some of the work necessary for the primary adoption need not be duplicated.

(e) The department, before incurring substantial costs for the followup adoption, shall require that a publisher or manufacturer who wishes to participate in the followup adoption first declare an intent to submit one or more specific programs for the followup adoption and specify the specific grade levels to be covered by each program. After a publisher or manufacturer has declared an intent to submit one or more programs and the grade levels
 to be covered by each program, the department shall assess a fee. The fee shall be payable by the publisher or manufacturer even if the publisher or manufacturer subsequently chooses to withdraw a program or reduce the number of grade levels covered. A submission by a publisher or manufacturer shall not be reviewed for purposes of adoption, either in a followup adoption or in any other primary or followup adoption conducted thereafter, until the fee assessed has been paid in full.

(f) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that the fee not be so substantial that it prevents small publishers or manufacturers from participating in a followup adoption.

(2) Upon the request of a small publisher or manufacturer, the state board may reduce the fee for participation in the followup adoption.

(3) For
 purposes of this section, “small publisher” and “small manufacturer” mean an independently owned or operated publisher or manufacturer that is not dominant in its field of operation, and that, together with its affiliates, has 100 or fewer employees, and has average annual gross receipts of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) or less over the previous three years.

(g) Revenue derived from fees charged pursuant to subdivision (e) shall be budgeted as reimbursements and subject to review through the annual budget process and may be used to pay costs associated with any adoption and any costs associated with the review of instructional materials.

(h) If the department determines that there is little or no interest by publishers and manufacturers in participating in a followup adoption, the department shall recommend to the state board that the followup adoption not be conducted and the
 state board may choose not to conduct the followup adoption.

(i) General Fund revenue shall not be used for the cost of conducting a followup adoption pursuant to this section, except that General Fund revenue appropriated to the Instructional Quality Commission in the annual Budget Act may be used to support the operational costs of the Instructional Quality Commission necessary to take action on the adoption.

(j) It is the intent of the Legislature that, notwithstanding any other law or regulation, consistent with subdivision (b) of Section 144 of Chapter 44 of the Statutes of 2021 (Assembly Bill 130 of the 2021–22 Regular Session) and to carry out the purposes of this chapter, the state board consider approval of high-quality online instructional materials, including open educational resources.

(k) This
 section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 86.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2032, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Other Uses [60310. - 60313.]

60310.

The following individuals or organizations may order instructional materials from lists adopted by the state board:

(a) The head of any state institution offering instruction in the elementary grades, or giving instruction in the teaching of elementary subjects.

(b) Governing boards or nonpublic schools.

(c) Individuals for use only in California.

The materials shall be purchased at the unit cost determined pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 60222.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1503, Sec. 14.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 15 of Ch. 1503.)
-------------------------------------------

60312.

The state board shall make available copies of adopted textbooks and other state adopted print materials in large print and other accessible media for pupils enrolled in the elementary schools whose visual acuity is 10/70 or less or who have other visual impairments making the use of these textbooks and alternate formats necessary. The state board shall make available adopted textbooks in braille characters for pupils enrolled in elementary schools whose corrected visual acuity is 20/200 or less. The state board may purchase or contract for the development of those materials.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 413, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

60313.

(a) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall maintain a central clearinghouse-depository and duplication center for the design, production, modification, and distribution of Braille, large print, special recordings, and other accessible versions of instructional materials for use by pupils with visual impairments or other disabilities who are enrolled in the public schools of California.

(b) Assistive devices placed in the depository shall consist of items designed for use by pupils with visual impairments.

(c) The instructional materials in specialized media shall be available, in a manner determined by the State Board of Education, to other pupils with disabilities enrolled in the public schools of California who are unable to progress in the general curriculum using conventional print copies of textbooks and other study materials.

(d) The specialized textbooks, reference books, recordings, study materials, tangible apparatus, equipment, and other similar items shall be available for use by students with visual impairments enrolled in the public community colleges, the California State University, and the University of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 734, Sec. 61.   Effective October 11, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. High School Textbooks [60400. - 60411.]



  ARTICLE 1. Adoption and Purchase [60400. - 60400.]

60400.

The governing board of each school district maintaining one or more high schools shall adopt instructional materials for use in the high schools under its control. Only instruction materials of those publishers who comply with the requirements of Article 3 (commencing with Section 60040) and Article 4 (commencing with Section 60060) of Chapter 1 of this part and of Section 60226 may be adopted by the district board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 734, Sec. 62.   Effective October 11, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Furnishing Textbooks to Pupils [60410. - 60411.]

60410.

The district board of each high school district may fix a charge not to exceed the cost of the books to the high school district for books furnished pupils in classes for adults. In lieu of fixing such charge, the board may lend books to such pupils and require the making of deposits by the pupils, the amount of deposit made by a pupil to be refunded to him upon the return by him of the books lent him in good condition, reasonable wear and tear excepted.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

60411.

The district board of each high school district shall purchase textbooks and may purchase supplementary books for the use of pupils enrolled in the high schools of the district. The textbooks and supplementary books shall at all times remain the property of the district, and shall be supplied to the pupils for use without charge.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Obsolete Materials [60510. - 60530.]



  ARTICLE 1. Donation or Sale [60510. - 60511.]

60510.

The state board, the governing board of a school district, or a county office of education may dispose of surplus or undistributed obsolete instructional materials in its possession that are usable for educational purposes in any of the following ways:

(a) By donation to a governing board, county free library, or other state institution.

(b) By donation to a public agency or institution of any territory or possession of the United States, or the government of a country that formerly was a territory or possession of the United States.

(c) By donation to a nonprofit charitable organization.

(d) By donation to children or adults in the State of California, or foreign countries for the purpose of increasing the general literacy of the people.

(e) By sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 321, Sec. 1.   (AB 487)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

60510.5.

(a) Prior to the disposition by a school district of any instructional materials pursuant to Section 60510, the school district governing board is encouraged to do both of the following: 

(1) No later than 60 days prior to that disposition, notify the public of its intention to dispose of those materials through a public service announcement on a television station in the county in which the district is located, a public notice in a newspaper of general circulation published in that county, or any other means that the governing board determines to reach most effectively the entities described in subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, of Section 60510. 

(2) Permit representatives of the entities described in subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, of Section 60510 and members of the public to address the governing board regarding that disposition. 

(b) This section does not apply to any school district that, as of January 1, 1992, had in operation a procedure for the disposition of instructional materials pursuant to Section 60510.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1028, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

60511.

Any organization, agency, or institution receiving obsolete instructional materials donated pursuant to this article shall certify to the governing board of the school district or the county board of education, as appropriate, that it agrees to make no charge of any kind to the persons to whom the organization gives or lends those materials.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 321, Sec. 3.   (AB 487)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Destruction [60530. - 60530.]

60530.

The state board, any district board which employs a superintendent of schools, and other school districts with the approval of the county superintendent of schools may dispose of unusable surplus or undistributed obsolete instructional materials, or such materials which are usable but cannot be distributed pursuant to Section 60510 in any of the following ways:

(a) Mutilated as not to be salable as instructional materials and sold for scrap or for use in the manufacture of paper pulp or other substances at the highest price that can be obtained.

(b) Destroyed by any economical means, provided that no instructional material shall be destroyed until 30 days after the governing board has given notice to all persons who have filed a request for such notice.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. California Assessment of Academic Achievement [60600. - 60648.5.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [60600. - 60603.]

60600.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Leroy Greene California Assessment of Academic Achievement Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 975, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

60602.5.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter to provide a system of assessments of pupils that has the primary purposes of assisting teachers, administrators, and pupils and their parents; improving teaching and learning; and promoting high-quality teaching and learning using a variety of assessment approaches and item types. The assessments, where applicable and valid, will produce scores that can be aggregated and disaggregated for the purpose of holding schools and local educational agencies accountable for the achievement of all their pupils in learning the California academic content standards. The system includes assessments or assessment tools for multiple grade levels that cover the full breadth
 and depth of the curriculum and promote the teaching of the full curriculum. In order to accomplish these goals, the Legislature finds and declares that California should adopt a coordinated and consolidated testing system to do all of the following:

(1) Develop and adopt a set of statewide academically rigorous content standards in all major subject areas to serve as the basis for modeling and promoting high-quality teaching and learning activities across the entire curriculum and assessing the academic achievement of pupils, as well as for schools, school districts, and for the California education system as a whole. Exclusive of those assessments established by a multistate consortium, produce performance standards to be adopted by the state board designed to lead to specific grade level benchmarks of academic achievement for
 each subject area tested within each grade level based on the knowledge, skills, and processes that pupils will need in order to succeed in the information-based, global economy of the 21st century.

(2) Provide information and resources to schools and local educational agencies to assist with the selection of local benchmark assessments, diagnostic assessments, and formative tools aligned with the state-adopted California academic content standards. The Legislature recognizes the importance of local tools and assessments used by schools and local educational agencies to monitor pupil achievement and to identify individual pupil strengths and weaknesses. The Legislature further recognizes the role the state may play in leveraging resources to provide schools and local educational agencies with information and tools for use at their
 discretion.

(3) Ensure that all assessment procedures, items, instruments, scoring systems, and results meet high standards of statistical reliability and validity, and that they do not use procedures, items, instruments, or scoring practices that are racially, culturally, socioeconomically, or gender biased.

(4) Provide information to pupils, parents and guardians, teachers, schools, and local educational agencies on a timely basis so the information can be used to further the development of the pupil or to improve the educational program. The Legislature recognizes that the majority of the assessments in the system will generate individual pupil scores that will provide information on pupil achievement to pupils, their parents or guardians, teachers, schools, and local
 educational agencies. The Legislature further recognizes that some assessments in the system may solely generate results at the school, school district, county, or state level for purposes of improving the education program and promoting the teaching and learning of the full curriculum.

(5) When administered as a census administration, results should be reported in terms describing a pupil’s academic performance in relation to the statewide academically rigorous content and performance standards and in terms of college and career readiness skills possessed by the pupil, in addition to being reported as a numerical. When appropriate, the reports should include a measure of growth that describes a pupil’s current status in relation to past performance.

(6) Where feasible,
 administer assessments via technology to enhance the assessment of challenging content using innovative item types and to facilitate expedited scoring.

(7) Minimize the amount of instructional time devoted to assessments administered pursuant to this chapter. It is the intent of the Legislature that any redundancies in statewide testing be eliminated as soon as is feasible.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature, pursuant to this article, to initiate planning for the implementation process to enable the Superintendent to accomplish the goals set forth in this section as soon as feasible.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that parents, classroom teachers, other educators, pupil representatives, institutions of higher
 education, business community members, and the public be involved, in an active and ongoing basis, in the design and implementation of the statewide pupil assessment system and the development of assessment instruments. The Legislature recognizes the important role that these stakeholders play in the success of the statewide pupil assessment system and the importance of providing them with information and resources about the new statewide system including the goals and appropriate uses of the system.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature, insofar as is practically and fiscally feasible and following the completion of annual testing, that the content, test structure, and test items in the assessments that are part of the statewide pupil assessment system become open and transparent to teachers, parents, and pupils, to assist stakeholders
 in working together to demonstrate improvement in pupil academic achievement. A planned change in annual test content, format, or design should be made available to educators and the public well before the beginning of the school year in which the change will be implemented.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that the results of the statewide pupil assessments be available for use, after appropriate validation, for academic credit, or placement and admissions processes, or both, at postsecondary educational institutions.

(f) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2014.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 489, Sec. 4.   (AB 484)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

60602.6.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the department minimize the impact to teachers and administrators and state resources by ensuring, where feasible, that future California computer-based assessments utilize the assessment delivery system infrastructure and hosting platform outlined in the Smarter Balanced Technical Hosting Solution, as approved by the Department of Technology for the statewide pupil assessment system. All computer-based statewide assessments, to the extent possible and most cost-effective, shall be developed to operate on the existing approved infrastructure, provide a single logical access point, support a single secure browser for remote and local access, and utilize uniform system development standards. The assessment delivery system infrastructure shall be
 scalable in nature to allow the department to incorporate additional computer-based statewide assessments as funded.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 29, Sec. 29.   (SB 828)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

60603.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Achievement level descriptors” means a narrative description of the knowledge, skills, and processes expected of pupils at different grade levels and at different performance levels on achievement tests.

(b) “Achievement test” means any summative standardized test that measures the level of performance that a pupil has achieved on state-adopted content standards.

(c) “California Assessment of Student Performance and Progress (CAASPP)” means the comprehensive assessment system, inclusive of consortium-developed assessments, that has the primary purpose of modeling and promoting high-quality teaching and instruction using a variety
 of assessment approaches and item types.

(d) “Census administration” means a test administration in which all pupils take comparable assessments of the same content and where results of individual performance are appropriate and meaningful to parents, pupils, and teachers.

(e) “Computer-adaptive assessment” means a computer-based test that utilizes a computer program to adjust the difficulty of test items throughout a testing session based on a test taker’s responses to previous test items during that testing session.

(f) “Computer-based assessment” means a test administered using an electronic computing device.

(g) “Consortium” means a multistate collaborative organized to develop a comprehensive system of assessments or formative tools such as
 described in Section 60605.7.

(h) “Constructed-response questions” means a type of assessment item that requires pupils to construct their own answers.

(i) “Content standards” means the specific academic knowledge, skills, and abilities that all public schools in this state are expected to teach, and all pupils are expected to learn, in reading, writing, mathematics, history-social science, world languages, visual and performing arts, and science, at each grade level tested.

(j) “Diagnostic assessment” means an assessment of particular knowledge or skills a pupil has or has not yet achieved for the purpose of informing instruction and making placement decisions.

(k) “End of course examination” means a comprehensive and challenging assessment of pupil
 achievement in a particular subject area or discipline.

(l) “Field test” means an assessment or assessment items administered to a representative sample of a population to ensure that the test or item produces results that are valid, reliable, and fair.

(m) “Formative assessment tools” means assessment tools and processes that are embedded in instruction and used by teachers and pupils to provide timely feedback for purposes of adjusting instruction to improve learning.

(n) “High-quality assessment” means an assessment designed to measure a pupil’s knowledge of, understanding of, and ability to apply, critical concepts through the use of a variety of item types and formats, including, but not necessarily limited to, items that allow for constructed responses and items that require the completion of performance tasks.
 A high-quality assessment should have the following characteristics:

(1) Enable measurement of pupil achievement and pupil growth to the extent feasible.

(2) Be of high technical quality by being valid, reliable, fair, and aligned to standards.

(3) Incorporate technology where appropriate.

(4) Include the assessment of pupils with disabilities and English learners.

(5) Use, to the extent feasible, universal design principles, as defined in Section 3 of the federal Assistive Technology Act of 1998 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 3002) in its development and administration.

(o) “Interim assessment” means an assessment that is designed to be
 given during the school year to evaluate a pupil’s knowledge and skills relative to specific academic standards in order to provide timely feedback, used in combination with other sources of information teachers have about their pupils’ progress, for purposes of continually adjusting instruction to improve learning, and that produces results that can be aggregated by classroom, course, grade level, or school.

(p) “Local educational agency” means a county office of education, school district, state special school, or direct-funded charter school as described in Section 47651.

(q) “Matrix sampling” means administering different portions of a single assessment to different groups of pupils for the purpose of sampling a broader representation of content and reducing testing time.

(r) “Performance standards” are standards
 that define various levels of competence at each grade level in each of the curriculum areas for which content standards are established. Performance standards gauge the degree to which a pupil has met the content standards and the degree to which a school or school district has met the content standards.

(s) “Performance tasks” are a collection of questions or activities that relate to a single scenario that include pupil interaction with stimulus. Performance tasks are a means to assess more complex skills such as writing, research, and analysis.

(t) “Personally identifiable information” includes a pupil’s name and other direct personal identifiers, such as the pupil’s identification number. Personally identifiable information also includes indirect identifiers, such as the pupil’s address and personal characteristics, or other information that would make the pupil’s identity
 easily traceable through the use of a single or multiple data sources, including publicly available information.

(u) “Population sampling” means administering assessments to a representative sample of pupils instead of the entire pupil population. The sample of pupils shall be representative in terms of various pupil subgroups, including, but not necessarily limited to, English learners and pupils with disabilities.

(v) “Recently arrived English learner” means a pupil designated as an English learner who is in his or her first 12 months of attending a school in the United States.

(w) “State-determined assessment calendar” means the scheduling of assessments, exclusive of those subject area assessments listed in subdivision (b) of Section 60640, over several years on a predetermined schedule. Content areas and grades
 shall only be assessed after being publicly announced at least two school years in advance of the assessment.

(x) “Summative assessment” means an assessment designed to be given near the end of the school year to evaluate a pupil’s knowledge and skills relative to a specific set of academic standards.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 865, Sec. 27.   (AB 2319)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Program Provisions [60604. - 60618.]

60604.

(a) The Superintendent shall design and implement, consistent with the timetable and plan required pursuant to subdivision (b), a statewide pupil assessment system consistent with the testing requirements of this article in accordance with the objectives set forth in Section 60602.5. That system shall include all of the following:

(1) Exclusive of the consortium assessments, a plan for producing or adopting valid, fair, and reliable achievement tests as recommended by the Superintendent and adopted by the state board pursuant to the California Assessment of Student Performance and Progress (CAASPP) established by Article 4 (commencing with Section 60640).

(2) A plan for administering the consortium summative assessment as outlined by the joint agreement of the consortium.

(3) Statewide academically rigorous content and performance standards that reflect the knowledge and complex skills that pupils will need in order to succeed in the information-based, global economy of the 21st century. These skills shall not include personal behavioral standards or skills, including, but not limited to, honesty, sociability, ethics, or self-esteem.

(4) A statewide system that provides the results of testing in a manner that reflects the degree to which pupils are achieving the academically rigorous content and performance standards adopted by the state board.

(5) The alignment of assessment with the statewide academically rigorous content and performance standards
 adopted by the state board.

(6) The active, ongoing involvement of parents, classroom teachers, administrators, other educators, governing board members of school districts, business community members, institutions of higher education, and the public in all phases of the design and implementation of the statewide pupil assessment system.

(7) A plan for ensuring the security and integrity of the CAASPP assessments.

(8) The development of a contract or contracts with a contractor for the development or administration of achievement tests and performance tasks aligned to state-adopted content standards, including summative assessments or assessments that employ matrix sampling or population sampling methods.

(b) The Superintendent shall develop and
 annually update for the Legislature a five-year cost projection, implementation plan for the CAASPP, and a timetable for implementing the system described in Section 60640. The annual update shall be submitted on or before March 1 of each year to the Department of Finance, the state board, and the respective chairpersons of the appropriate fiscal subcommittees considering budget appropriations and the appropriate policy committees in each house. The update shall explain any significant variations from the five-year cost projection for the current year budget and the proposed budget.

(c) The Superintendent shall make resources available that are designed to assist with the interpretation and use of the CAASPP results to promote the use of the results for purposes of improving pupil learning and educational programs across the full curriculum. The Superintendent shall consider information already provided by assessment consortia to which
 California belongs or assessment contractors when fulfilling this requirement.

(d) The Superintendent shall make information and resources available to parents, teachers, pupils, administrators, school board members, and the public regarding the CAASPP, including, but not necessarily limited to, system goals, purposes, scoring systems, results, valid uses of assessments, and information on the relationship between performance on the previous state assessments and the CAASPP.

(e) The Superintendent and the state board shall consider comments and recommendations from teachers, administrators, pupil representatives, institutions of higher education, and the public in the development, adoption, and approval of assessment instruments.

(f) The results of the achievement tests, exclusive of the consortium summative
 assessments, administered pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 60640), shall be returned to the local educational agencies within the period of time specified by the state board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 327, Sec. 18.   (AB 1599)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

60604.5.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the reauthorization of the statewide pupil assessment program include all of the following:

(1) A plan for transitioning to a system of high-quality assessments.

(2) Alignment with the standards developed pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 60605.8.

(3) Any common assessments aligned with the standards developed pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 60605.8.

(4) Conformity to the assessment requirements of any reauthorization of the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act
 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 6301 et seq.) or any other federal law that effectively replaces that act.

(b) The Superintendent shall develop recommendations for the reauthorization of the statewide pupil assessment program. The recommendations shall include, but not be limited to, a plan for transitioning to a system of high-quality assessments. The recommendations shall consider including all of the following in the reauthorized assessment system:

(1) Aligning the assessments to the standards adopted or revised pursuant to Section 60605.8.

(2) Implementing and incorporating any common assessments aligned with the common set of standards developed by the Common Core State Standards Initiative consortium or other interstate collaboration in which the state participates.

(3) Conforming to the assessment requirements of any reauthorization of the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 6301 et seq.) or any other federal law that effectively replaces that act.

(4) Enabling the valid, reliable, and fair measurement of achievement at a point in time and over time for groups and subgroups of pupils, and for individual pupils.

(5) Allowing the comparison from one year to the next of an individual pupil’s scale scores in each content area tested, so as to reflect the growth in that pupil’s actual scores over time.

(6) Enabling and including the valid, reliable, and fair measurement of achievement of all pupils, including pupils with disabilities and English learners.

(7) Providing for the assessment of English learners using primary language assessments.

(8) Ensuring that no aspect of the system creates any bias with respect to race, ethnicity, culture, religion, gender, or sexual orientation.

(9) Incorporating a variety of item types and formats, including, but not limited to, open-ended responses and performance-based tasks.

(10) Generating multiple measures of pupil achievement, which, when combined with other measures, can be used to determine the effectiveness of instruction and the extent of learning.

(11) Including the assessment of science and history-social science in all grade levels at or above grade 4.

(12) Assessing a pupil’s understanding of and ability to use the technology necessary for success in the 21st century classroom and workplace.

(13) Providing for both formative and interim assessments, as those terms are defined in this chapter, in order to provide timely feedback for purposes of continually adjusting instruction to improve learning.

(14) Making use of test administration and scoring technologies that will allow the return of test results to parents and teachers as soon as is possible in order to support instructional improvement.

(15) Minimizing testing time while not jeopardizing the validity, reliability, fairness, or instructional usefulness of the assessment results.

(16) Including options for diagnostic assessments for pupils in grade 2.

(c) In developing the recommendations pursuant to this section, the Superintendent shall consult with all of the following:

(1) The state board.

(2) Measurement experts from California’s public and private universities.

(3) Individuals with expertise in assessing pupils with disabilities and English learners.

(4) Teachers, administrators, and governing board members, from California’s local educational agencies.

(5) Parents.

(d) The Superintendent shall report the recommendations developed pursuant to this section to the fiscal and appropriate policy committees of both houses of the Legislature on or before November 1, 2012.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 32, Sec. 105.   (AB 1808)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

60605.

(a) (1) (A) Not later than January 1, 1998, the state board shall adopt statewide academically rigorous content standards, pursuant to the recommendations of the Commission for the Establishment of Academic Content and Performance Standards, in the core curriculum areas of reading, writing, and mathematics to serve as the basis for assessing the academic achievement of individual pupils and of schools, school districts, and the California educational system. Not later than November 1, 1998, the state board shall adopt these standards in the core curriculum areas of history/social science and science.

(B) The state board shall adopt statewide performance standards in the core curriculum areas of reading, writing, mathematics, history/social science, and science based on the recommendations made by the Superintendent of a contractor or contractors.

(C) The state board shall require the contractor or contractors to submit performance standards to the Superintendent and the state board not later than a specified date that allows sufficient opportunity for the Superintendent to make a recommendation to the state board and for the state board to conduct regional hearings prior to the adoption of the performance standards.
